District of Columbia statutes.
22-3011

Defenses to child sexual abuse and sexual abuse of a minor.

(a)

Neither mistake of age nor consent is a defense to a prosecution under §§ 22-3008 to 22-3010.01, prosecuted alone or in conjunction with charges under § 22-3018 or § 22-403.

(b)

Marriage or domestic partnership between the defendant and the child or minor at the time of the offense is a defense, which the defendant must establish by a preponderance of the evidence, to a prosecution under §§ 22-3008 to 22-3010.01, prosecuted alone or in conjunction with charges under § 22-3018 or § 22-403, involving only the defendant and the child or minor.

History

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 210, 42 DCR 53
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 216(f), 53 DCR 8610
June 3, 2011, D.C. Law 18-377, § 11(b), 58 DCR 1174

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-4111.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-306, in the section heading, substituted “abuse and sexual abuse of a minor” for “abuse”; and substituted “§ 22-3010.01” for “§ 22-3010” both times it appears.
D.C. Law 18-377, in subsec. (b), substituted “Marriage or domestic partnership between the defendant and the child” for “Marriage between the defendant and the child” and substituted “child or minor” for “child”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(f) of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(f) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(f) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 216(f) of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 511(b) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-693, January 18, 2011, 58 DCR 640).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 511(b) of Public Safety Legislation Sixty-Day Layover Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-45, April 20, 2011, 58 DCR 3701).